Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-717
Department of Health and Human Services; assume responsibility for public assistance programs.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall assume the responsibility for all public assistance, including aid to families with dependent children, emergency assistance, assistance to the aged, blind, or disabled, medically handicapped children's services, commodities, the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, and medical assistance.

Laws 1982, LB 522, § 33;

Laws 1983, LB 604, § 23;

Laws 1985, LB 249, § 4;

Laws 1989, LB 362, § 8;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 301;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 244;

Laws 2009, LB288, § 17.